Utah statutes.
26-2-11.   Name or sex change -- Registration of court order and amendment of birth certificate.

(1)  When a person born in this state has a name change or sex change approved by an order of a Utah district court or a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or a province of Canada, a certified copy of the order may be filed with the state registrar with an application form provided by the registrar.

(2) (a)  Upon receipt of the application, a certified copy of the order, and payment of the required fee, the state registrar shall review the application, and if complete, register it and note the fact of the amendment on the otherwise unaltered original certificate.

(b)  The amendment shall be registered with and become a part of the original certificate and a certified copy shall be issued to the applicant without additional cost.

